Utah statutes.
53A-1a-512.5.   Criminal background checks on school personnel.

The following individuals are required to submit to a criminal background check as provided in Section 53A-3-410:

(1)  an employee of a charter school;

(2)  a volunteer for a charter school who is given significant unsupervised access to a student in connection with the volunteer's assignment; or

(3)  a contract employee, as defined in Section 53A-3-410, who works at a charter school.

